Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-486
License; expiration.

All game breeding and controlled shooting area licenses shall expire on June 30 of each year at midnight.

Laws 1957, c. 152, § 3, p. 493;

Laws 1987, LB 206, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-903;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 196.